Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.160

Website presentation about state budgets.

The legislative evaluation and accountability program, in conjunction with the office of financial management, must create a website presentation accessible 24 hours a day beginning August 15th of each year containing the following information:

(1)(a) A summary of each of the following:

(i) The adopted operating budget and supplemental operating budget for the most recent fiscal biennium;

(ii) The adopted capital budget and supplemental capital budget for the most recent fiscal biennium; and

(iii) The adopted transportation budget and supplemental transportation budget for the most recent fiscal biennium;

(b) Every summary required by (a) of this subsection must additionally include:

(i) The numbers of each bill that was part of the budget for that session;

(ii) Access information for each bill on the official legislative website;

(iii) The date that each bill was approved with brief instructions on how to locate roll call votes online; and

(iv) The number of votes cast for and against each bill;

(2) Graphical depictions of funds subject to outlook and a data visualization showing total budgeted funds for the state operating budget by functional areas of government for the most recent biennium;

(3) Tables provided by the office of financial management comparing state and local expenditures with personal income from the most recent fiscal year available to each fiscal year going back 20 years; and

(4) A list, generated by the legislative evaluation and accountability program in coordination with the office of financial management, of every bill for which an analysis was produced in compliance with RCW 43.135.031, and links to the legislative website for each bill on the list so the public may see how legislators voted and instructions for voters on how to locate analyses produced in compliance with RCW 43.135.031.

[ 2023 c 109 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: See note following RCW 29A.32.070.